Indiana, session 2026, HB1064.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Indiana:
SECTION 1. IC 10-19-2-2, AS AMENDED BY P.L.187-2021,
SECTION 10, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 2. (a) The department shall do the following:
(1) Develop a single strategic plan for preparing for and
responding to homeland security emergencies.
(2) Assess state and local security needs.
(3) Administer all state emergency management and response
training programs.
(4) Administer the state's emergency operations functions during
an emergency.
(5) Administer the following:
(A) IC 10-14.
(B) IC 16-31.
(C) IC 22-11.
(D) IC 22-12.
(E) IC 22-13.
(F) IC 22-14.
2026 IN 1064—LS 6460/DI 148


(G) IC 22-15.
(6) Develop and administer a program to verify liability
insurance policies described in IC 32-40-5-1.
(b) The executive director may organize the personnel and functions
of the department into divisions and subdivisions to carry out the
executive director's powers and duties and the powers and duties of the
department. The executive director may periodically consolidate,
divide, or abolish divisions and subdivisions as is necessary to carry
out those powers and duties.
SECTION 2. IC 32-40 IS ADDED TO THE INDIANA CODE AS
A NEW ARTICLE TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE JULY 1,
2026]:
ARTICLE 40. UNMANNED AERIAL VEHICLES
Chapter 1. Applicability
Sec. 1. (a) This article applies to unmanned aerial vehicles
operating at or below an altitude of four hundred (400) feet.
(b) This article does not apply to any of the following:
(1) Emergency responders, including:
(A) a firefighter;
(B) an emergency medical person; or
(C) a member of a search and rescue team or mission.
(2) Law enforcement's use of an unmanned aerial vehicle
under IC 35-33-5.
(3) FAA certified airspace transit.
(4) Any regulatory entity for purposes of licensure
inspections.
(5) An individual if the individual:
(A) is only operating the unmanned aerial vehicle over the
individual's property; or
(B) is acting on behalf of:
(i) the federal government;
(ii) the state; or
(iii) a local government;
for a government or military purpose.
Chapter 2. Definitions
Sec. 1. The definitions in this chapter apply throughout this
article.
Sec. 2. "Enclosed curtilage" refers to the area immediately
surrounding a dwelling, including a fenced in yard or any other
space shielded from public view, where a person has a reasonable
expectation of privacy.
Sec. 3. "Liability insurance" refers to an insurance policy that
2026 IN 1064—LS 6460/DI 148


covers property damages and bodily injury caused by an
unmanned aerial vehicle.
Sec. 4. "Unmanned aerial vehicle" means an aircraft that does
not carry a human operator and that is capable of flight under
remote control or autonomous programming. The term includes
the following:
(1) An unmanned aircraft and an unmanned aircraft system
(both as defined in the Federal Aviation Administration
Modernization and Reform Act of 2012 (P.L.112-95, 126 Stat.
11)).
(2) A small unmanned aircraft and a small unmanned aircraft
system (both as defined in 14 CFR 107.3).
Chapter 3. Civil Actions Involving Unmanned Aerial Vehicles
Sec. 1. (a) Repeatedly operating an unmanned aerial vehicle
over private real property without the property owner's
permission is a nuisance.
(b) A person who knowingly or intentionally violates this section
commits a Class A misdemeanor.
Sec. 2. The following actions are considered a civil trespass for
purposes of this chapter if done without the property owner's
permission:
(1) Operating an unmanned aerial vehicle not more than one
hundred (100) feet above:
(A) ground level over; or
(B) a permanent structure located on;
private real property.
(2) Landing an unmanned aerial vehicle on private real
property.
Sec. 3. (a) A person may bring an action under this chapter if
the person's:
(1) property is injuriously affected; or
(2) personal enjoyment is lessened;
by a nuisance described in section 1(a) of this chapter or a civil
trespass described in section 2 of this chapter.
(b) A person that successfully defends an action under this
section is entitled to reasonable costs and attorney's fees incurred
in defending the action.
Sec. 4. A court may do any one (1) or more of the following:
(1) Issue an injunction.
(2) Award damages, including punitive damages.
(3) Impose a civil penalty not greater than one thousand
dollars ($1,000) per incident. However, a civil penalty under
2026 IN 1064—LS 6460/DI 148


this subdivision may be increased to not greater than five
thousand dollars ($5,000) per incident if the incident involved
operating an unmanned aerial vehicle over:
(A) livestock;
(B) a farm building;
(C) a farm worker; or
(D) any farm equipment.
Chapter 4. Crimes Involving Unmanned Aerial Vehicles
Sec. 1. (a) A person who knowingly or intentionally operates an
unmanned aerial vehicle over or inside any of the following
locations commits a Class A misdemeanor:
(1) A school when children are present.
(2) A playground when children are present.
(3) A child care facility when children are present.
(4) A penal facility or a juvenile facility.
(5) A private dwelling, including any enclosed curtilage.
(6) A confined space such as a livestock barn.
(b) It is a defense to a prosecution under this section that the
person who engaged in the conduct prohibited by subsection (a)
had express consent.
Sec. 2. (a) A person who knowingly or intentionally operates an
unmanned aerial vehicle over:
(1) animals or livestock; or
(2) agricultural workers in a field or barn;
commits a Class A misdemeanor.
(b) It is a defense to a prosecution under this section that the
person who engaged in the conduct prohibited by subsection (a)
had the property owner's permission.
Sec. 3. (a) A person who knowingly or intentionally uses an
unmanned aerial vehicle to:
(1) record video or audio of;
(2) collect:
(A) visual;
(B) audio; or
(C) thermal;
data regarding; or
(3) photograph;
an individual or area of private real property without the
individual's or property owner's permission commits a Class A
misdemeanor.
(b) The offense under subsection (a) is a level 6 felony if the
subject of the recording, data, or photograph involves critical
2026 IN 1064—LS 6460/DI 148


infrastructure for agriculture or energy.
(c) It is a defense to a prosecution under this section that the
person who engaged in the conduct prohibited by subsection (a) or
(b) had the property owner's permission.
Chapter 5. Liability Insurance
Sec. 1. A person who operates an unmanned aerial vehicle that
is at least fifty-five (55) pounds must purchase and maintain
liability insurance.
SECTION 3. IC 35-52-32-5 IS ADDED TO THE INDIANA CODE
AS A NEW SECTION TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE JULY
1, 2026]: Sec. 5. IC 32-40-3-1 defines a crime concerning repeated
operation of an unmanned aerial vehicle over private real property
without permission.
SECTION 4. IC 35-52-32-5.1 IS ADDED TO THE INDIANA
CODE AS A NEW SECTION TO READ AS FOLLOWS
[EFFECTIVE JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 5.1. IC 32-40-4-1 defines a crime
concerning operation of an unmanned aerial vehicle over
prohibited places.
SECTION 5. IC 35-52-32-5.2 IS ADDED TO THE INDIANA
CODE AS A NEW SECTION TO READ AS FOLLOWS
[EFFECTIVE JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 5.2. IC 32-40-4-2 defines a crime
concerning operation of an unmanned aerial vehicle over animals,
livestock, or agricultural workers.
SECTION 6. IC 35-52-32-5.3 IS ADDED TO THE INDIANA
CODE AS A NEW SECTION TO READ AS FOLLOWS
[EFFECTIVE JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 5.3. IC 32-40-4-3 defines a crime
concerning operation of an unmanned aerial vehicle to collect
recordings, data, or photographs.
2026 IN 1064—LS 6460/DI 148